Utah statutes.
76-2-105.   Transferred intent.

Where intentionally causing a result is an element of an offense, that element is established even if a different person than the actor intended was killed, injured, or harmed, or different property than the actor intended was damaged or otherwise affected.



Enacted by Chapter 199, 2004 General Session

